Massachusetts, session 194th, HD5038.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Subsection (b) of section 13B of chapter 268 of the General Laws, as appearing in the
2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following 2 sentences:- If the
misconduct utilizes social media or internet communications, such person shall be punished by
imprisonment in the state prison for not more than 20 years or by imprisonment in the house of
correction for not more than 2½ years or by a fine of not more than $10,000 or by both such fine
and imprisonment. If the misconduct occurs within 50 feet of the courthouse in which a
proceeding described in this section occurred or will occur, such person shall be punished by
imprisonment in the state prison for not more than 20 years or by imprisonment in the house of
correction for not more than 2½ years or by a fine of not more than $10,000 or by both such fine
and imprisonment.
of 1